Illinois, session 104th, HB4520.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much of that sum as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund for deposit into the Hunger-Free Campus Grant Fund. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 82026.